District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-1047

Dissolution; generally.

Repealed.

History

July 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-138, § 48, 41 DCR 3010
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 31, 43 DCR 530
June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-133, § 2(f), 47 DCR 2686
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(s), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-1047.
1981 Ed., § 29-1347.